Utah statutes.
39-6-75.   Absence without leave.
A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court
directs, who without authority:
(1)  fails to go to his appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;
(2)  leaves his appointed place of duty, or is guilty of desertion;
(3)  absents himself or remains absent from his unit, organization, or place
of duty where he is required to be at the time prescribed.
